District of Columbia statutes.
50-2405

Jurisdiction over Blue Plains Impoundment Lot.

Within 90 days of September 9, 1989, the Mayor shall transfer jurisdiction of the Blue Plains Impoundment Lot from the Metropolitan Police Department to the Department of Public Works to store and auction abandoned vehicles and submit a feasibility study with recommendations on the use of private contractors to store and auction abandoned vehicles.

History

Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 8, 36 DCR 4575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-835.

Effective Dates

Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.